Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 2. Nature of Partnership.

§79-13-201.
Partnership as entity.

A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

A limited liability partnership continues to be the same entity that existed before the filing of a statement of qualification under Section 79-13-1001.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 201, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected a typographical error in (b). “Section 79-13-1001” was substituted for “Section 79-13-1201.”

Former § 79-13-201 was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as § 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 13 heading.

Where creditor sold farm supplies to partnership in which debtor was general partner, creditor was not entitled to administrative expense claim because partnership was separate legal entity and parties stipulated that farm supplies were delivered to partnership, and not to either general partner. In re Spencer, — B.R. —, 2016 Bankr. LEXIS 3867 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. Nov. 1, 2016).

§79-13-202.
Formation of partnership.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit forms a partnership, whether or not the persons intend to form a partnership.

An association formed under a statute other than this chapter, a predecessor statute, or a comparable statute of another jurisdiction is not a partnership under this chapter.

In determining whether a partnership is formed, the following rules apply:

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the co-owners share profits made by the use of the property.

The sharing of gross returns does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in property from which the returns are derived.

A person who receives a share of the profits of a business is presumed to be a partner in the business, unless the profits were received in payment:

Of a debt by installments or otherwise;

For services as an independent contractor or of wages or other compensation to an employee;

Of rent;

Of an annuity or other retirement or health benefit to a beneficiary, representative, or designee of a deceased or retired partner;

Of interest or other charge on a loan, even if the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business, including a direct or indirect present or future ownership of the collateral, or rights to income, proceeds, or increase in value derived from the collateral; or

For the sale of the goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 202, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (a) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by inserting the word “of” following “...to carry on as co-owners...” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

A surviving spouse was entitled to a directed verdict because, although a claimant had to prove that the surviving spouse and the decedent were in a partnership, no evidence of a partnership was presented as there was no evidence that the surviving spouse and the decedent intended to run the business as partners, that the surviving spouse controlled the direction of the business, or that the surviving spouse and the decedent were sharing profits. Malouf v. Evans, 276 So.3d 1184, 2018 Miss. App. LEXIS 326 (Miss. Ct. App. 2018), rev'd, 267 So.3d 272, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 151 (Miss. 2019).

Chancellor did not abuse his discretion in finding no partnership existed between the parties, given that appellant did not prove that the parties intended to enter into a partnership agreement for a business, and thus appellant could not claim that the parties entered a partnership with the property based on its association with the business, plus appellant failed to prove that she controlled the day-to-day operations or the direction of the business, and only appellee received dividends. Carlson v. Brabham, 199 So.3d 735, 2016 Miss. App. LEXIS 32 (Miss. Ct. App.), cert. denied, 203 So.3d 597, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 395 (Miss. 2016).

§79-13-203.
Partnership property.

Property acquired by a partnership is property of the partnership and not of the partners individually.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 203, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Former
§ 79-13-203 was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as
§ 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 13 heading.

Partner not co-owner of partnership property, see § 79-13-501.

Chancery court erred in finding that a partner’s attorney converted the partner’s property because the evidence failed to establish that the checks or the funds at issue belonged to the partner individually where the property was either property of the partnership or represented the co-partner’s share of the liquid assets of the partnership. Newton v. Brown, 198 So.3d 1284, 2016 Miss. App. LEXIS 333 (Miss. Ct. App. 2016).

§79-13-204.
When property is partnership property.

Property is partnership property if acquired in the name of:

The partnership; or

One or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership but without an indication of the name of the partnership.

Property is acquired in the name of the partnership by a transfer to:

The partnership in its name; or

One or more partners in their capacity as partners in the partnership, if the name of the partnership is indicated in the instrument transferring title to the property.

Property is presumed to be partnership property if purchased with partnership assets, even if not acquired in the name of the partnership or of one or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership.

Property acquired in the name of one or more of the partners, without an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership and without use of partnership assets, is presumed to be separate property, even if used for partnership purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 204, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Transfer of partnership property, see § 79-13-302.

Partner not co-owner of partnership property, see §§ 79-13-501.

Evidence supported
the chancellor’s determination that the property at issue was
partnership property where the testimony revealed that all of these
properties were treated as partnership property, that they were purchased
with partnership funds, that the property taxes were paid with partnership
funds, and that the rent from the properties was collected by and
paid to the partnership.
White v. White (In re White), 234 So.3d 1210, 2017 Miss. LEXIS 351 (Miss. 2017).